Massachusetts, session 194th, H1802.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 120 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place 
thereof the following:- 
This section shall not apply to tenants or occupants of residential premises who, having 
rightfully entered said premises at the commencement of the tenancy or occupancy, continue to 
legally reside at the property per a lease or written agreement. The owner or landlord of said 
premises may request from the sheriff of the county in which the property is located the 
immediate removal of a person or persons occupying the property, provided that: 
The property was not open to members of the public at the time the occupant or 
occupants entered; 
The property owner or landlord has directed the occupant or occupants to vacate or leave 
the property; and 

of 2 13  The occupant or occupants have not signed a lease or written agreement entitling them to 
reside at the property, have remained on the property after their lease or written agreement has 
expired, or have knowingly and willingly failed to adhere to the terms of the lease or written 
agreement. 
The property owner or landlord may petition the sheriff’s office of the county in which 
the property is located by presenting a completed and verified complaint to remove persons 
unlawfully occupying residential real property, which shall verify that the above conditions are 
met. The owner or landlord may submit this form in writing or complete it online.